Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-148] Malingering. Any person
subject to this chapter who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service
in the state military forces:

(1) Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental
lapse or derangement; or

(2) Intentionally inflicts self-injury;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next